Utah statutes.
31A-4-112.   Political activities.

(1)  Title 36, Chapter 11, Lobbyist Disclosure and Regulation Act, applies to the lobbying efforts of every person subject to regulation under this title.

(2)  Except insurers with excess surplus, an insurer doing business in Utah may not directly or indirectly pay or use, or offer or agree to pay or use any money or thing of value:

(a)  for or in aid of any political office;

(b)  for the nomination for the political office; or

(c)  for reimbursement or indemnification of any person for money or property used to aid any political office.



Amended by Chapter 9, 1996 Special Session 2

